Wyoming, session 2025, HB0091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-815(d) is amended to read:

1-26-815. Right of eminent domain granted; ways of
necessity for authorized businesses; purposes; extent.
HB0091

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0102

(d) No person qualified to exercise the condemnation
authority granted by this section, except a public utility
that has been granted a certificate of public convenience
and necessity pursuant to W.S. 37-2-205, shall exercise the
condemnation authority granted under this section for the
erection, placement or expansion of collector systems
associated with commercial facilities generating
electricity. from wind. The prohibition imposed by this
subsection shall be effective immediately and shall end
June 30, 2015 or upon the effective date of legislation
establishing additional conditions for the use of
condemnation authority for the erection, placement or
expansion of collector systems associated with commercial
facilities generating electricity from wind, whichever
occurs earlier. As used in this subsection, "collector
systems associated with commercial facilities generating
electricity" from wind" means the conductor infrastructure,
including conductors, towers, substations, switchgear and
other components necessary to deliver power from any
commercial facility generating electricity from wind up to
but not including electric substations or interconnections
facilities associated with existing or proposed
HB0091

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0102
transmission lines that serve load or that export energy
from Wyoming. In addition:

(i) A commercial facility generating electricity
shall not use an existing easement agreement or order
granting an easement to the condemnor to place additional
energy collector systems associated with a commercial
facility generating electricity without first complying
with this section unless the existing easement:

(A) Authorizes initial or additional energy
collector systems;

(B) Contemplates a method by which an
easement can be enlarged or amended; or

(C) Authorizes the parties to renegotiate
the easement.

(ii) Before a condemnation action is commenced
under this section, the entity seeking to condemn property
shall give notice to the board of county commissioners of
HB0091

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0102
the county and any local governing body of the city or town
in which the condemnation is to take place;

(iii) Any order granting an easement to a
condemnor under this section shall include clauses relating
to liability of the parties for potential damages arising
from activities occurring on the condemned property and
reclamation requirements pertaining to the condemnor's use
of the property.

Section 2. This act applies to eminent domain actions
initiated on or after July 1, 2025. This act shall not be
construed to impair existing contracts.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0091